District of Columbia statutes.
29-1104

Governing law.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the law of the District shall govern the operation in the District of all unincorporated nonprofit associations formed or operating in the District.

(b)

Unless the governing principles specify a different jurisdiction, the law of the jurisdiction in which an unincorporated nonprofit association has its main place of activities shall govern the internal affairs of the association.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 4 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).